Florida, session 2026, HB337.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 163.31791, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
163.31791 Food insecure areas.—
(1) The Legislature finds that access to affordable,
healthy food options, especially fresh fruits and vegetables, is
restricted due, in part, to the absence of supermarkets located
within a convenient traveling distance. This restriction
constitutes a threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the
residents of this state. Therefore, the Legislature finds that
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb337-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 337 2026
it serves an important public purpose to encourage local
governments to grant or approve development permits for land
designated as a food insecure area in order to increase the
availability of nutrient-dense food options.
(2) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Food insecure area" is synonymous with "food desert"
and means a parcel of land that has been identified by the
Office of Economic and Demographic Research as being located in
an area:
1. Having a poverty rate of at least 20 percent or having
a median family income at or below 80 percent of the median
family income for this state; and
2. Having at least 500 persons, or at least 33 percent of
the population, who, in urban communities, live more than 1 mile
from a supermarket or who, in rural communities, live more than
10 miles from a supermarket.
(b) "Nutrient-dense food" means a food that has a high
level of nutrients in relationship to the number of calories it
contains. The term includes fresh fruits and vegetables, whole
grains, nuts, seeds, beans and legumes, and low-fat dairy
products.
(c) "Small-footprint grocery store" means a grocery store
that:
1. Sells products at wholesale or retail;
2. Derives at least 30 percent of its gross receipts from
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb337-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 337 2026
the retail sale of nutrient-dense foods; and
3. Operates in a food insecure area.
(d) "Supermarket" means a grocery store that contains all
of the major food departments found in a large retail grocery
store.
(3) Notwithstanding any other restrictions, a local
government may enact land development regulations authorizing
land use for a small-footprint grocery store located in a food
insecure area.
(4) Notwithstanding any other restrictions, a local
government may include in its comprehensive plan a provision
authorizing land use for a small-footprint grocery store located
in a food insecure area.
(5) A local government may require mandatory reporting of
certain information from small-footprint grocery stores.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb337-00